Washington statutes.
RCW 43.119.040

Duties of commission—State agencies to give assistance.

(1) The Washington state women's commission shall have the following duties:

(a) Actively recruit and maintain a list of names of qualified women to fill vacancies on various boards and commissions;

(b) Provide a clearinghouse for information regarding both state and federal legislation as it relates to the purpose of this chapter;

(c) Identify and define specific needs of women of color and provide recommendations for addressing those needs in the biennial report to the legislature and governor under (j) of this subsection;

(d) Consult with state agencies regarding the effect of agency policies, procedures, practices, laws, and administrative rules on the unique problems and needs of women. The commission shall also advise such state agencies on the development and implementation of comprehensive and coordinated policies, plans, and programs focusing on those problems and needs;

(e) Provide resource and referral information to agencies and the public. The commission may gather data and disseminate information to the public in order to implement the purposes of this chapter;

(f) Hold public hearings to gather input on issues related to the unique problems and needs of women. The commission must include in the biennial report submitted under (j) of this subsection the input received and recommendations for addressing the problems and needs discussed at the public hearings;

(g) Advocate for removal of legal and social barriers for women;

(h) Review best practices for sexual harassment policies and training and provide recommendations to state agencies as they update their sexual harassment policies. The commission shall also maintain a file of sexual harassment policies that meet high quality standards and make these files available for agency use;

(i) Review and make recommendations to the legislature on strategies to increase the number of women serving on for-profit corporate boards with gross income of five million dollars or more; and

(j) Submit a report to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor every two years detailing the commission's activities. The report submitted must be in electronic format pursuant to RCW 43.01.036.

(2) State agencies must provide appropriate and reasonable assistance to the commission as needed, including gathering data and information, in order for the commission to carry out the purpose of this chapter.

[ 2018 c 98 s 5.]